Colorado, session 2026A, SB030.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the "State
Park and State Wildlife Area Access Funding Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Colorado's great outdoors and wildlife are among the state's
treasured resources, enriching Coloradans' quality of life;
(b) All people should have unhindered access to the unparalleled
outdoor recreation opportunities offered by Colorado's state parks and
state wildlife areas, regardless of the mode of transportation used to
access a state park or state wildlife area;
(c) Despite growth in outdoor recreation, many Colorado families
lack access to the experience, equipment, off-road vehicles, and resources
-3- SB26-030

necessary to visit our state parks and state wildlife areas;
(d) While outdoor recreation brings prosperity to the state and its
residents through tourism and the collection of sales tax, it also places an
unfunded mandate on the counties in which state parks and state wildlife
areas are located;
(e) To provide equitable infrastructure access and to reduce
barriers for those families with limited resources to access outdoor
recreation, counties need support for constructing and maintaining roads
that access state parks and state wildlife areas;
(f) Numerous factors contribute to the need for the construction
and maintenance of roads that provide local access to state parks and state
wildlife areas from within a county's boundaries, including:
(I) The current surfaces of roads that provide access to state parks
and state wildlife areas were not designed or constructed to withstand the
high volume of traffic using these roads or the heavy weight of trucks,
campers, towed trailers, and boats;
(II) State sales tax is not a source of revenue for counties;
(III) Funding for county roads is based on the amount of money
in the highway users tax fund, established pursuant to section 43-4-201,
Colorado Revised Statutes;
(IV) For many counties in which state parks and state wildlife
areas are located, the county population is significantly lower than the
number of visitors who access the state parks and state wildlife areas
located in the county's boundaries each year; and
(V) The remote location of state parks and state wildlife areas
compounds the challenges and costs associated with constructing and
maintaining roads and other infrastructure needed for accessing those
-4- SB26-030

state parks and state wildlife areas;
(g) The rapid increase in demand for outdoor recreation is
challenging the ability of local governments to maintain the roads and
other infrastructure needed to provide access to all individuals and
families who want to visit a state park or state wildlife area, regardless of
the type of vehicle the family can afford;
(h) Despite tremendous growth in outdoor recreation, existing
funding to support the variety of ways Colorado families access our state
parks and state wildlife areas is insufficient. This leads to increased
barriers for families and can deter visitors from accessing state parks and
state wildlife areas.
(i) Local governments share the access goals of the state and rely
on a financial partnership with the state and other partners to help meet
the demand and ensure that Colorado's state parks and state wildlife areas
are accessible to all; and
(j) A key objective of this "State Park and State Wildlife Area
Access Funding Act" is to ensure that all state parks and state wildlife
areas provide welcoming and equitable access to all park pass purchasers
and to all visitors of state parks and state wildlife areas.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 24-32-136 as
follows:
24-32-136. State park and state wildlife area access grant
program - creation - fund - reporting - definitions - rules - repeal.
(1) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) "ELIGIBLE APPLICANT" MEANS A LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT
APPLIES TO THE GRANT PROGRAM.
-5- SB26-030

(b) "FUND" MEANS THE STATE PARK AND STATE WILDLIFE AREA
ACCESS CASH FUND CREATED IN SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) "GRANT RECIPIENT" MEANS AN ELIGIBLE APPLICANT THAT THE
DIVISION SELECTS TO RECEIVE MONEY THROUGH THE GRANT PROGRAM.
(d) "LOCAL GOVERNMENT" MEANS A HOME RULE OR STATUTORY
CITY, TOWN, CITY AND COUNTY, OR COUNTY.
(e) "STATE PARK AND STATE WILDLIFE AREA ACCESS GRANT
PROGRAM" OR "GRANT PROGRAM" MEANS THE STATE PARK AND STATE
WILDLIFE AREA ACCESS GRANT PROGRAM CREATED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF
THIS SECTION.
(2) State park and state wildlife area access grant program -
created - rules.
(a) THE STATE PARK AND STATE WILDLIFE AREA ACCESS GRANT
PROGRAM IS CREATED IN THE DIVISION FOR THE PURPOSE OF AWARDING
GRANTS TO ELIGIBLE APPLICANTS TO ENABLE LOCAL GOVERNMENTS TO:
(I) CONSTRUCT AND MAINTAIN ROADS OR OTHER INFRASTRUCTURE
THAT PROVIDE ACCESS TO A STATE PARK OR STATE WILDLIFE AREA
ACCESSED FROM WITHIN THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S BOUNDARY;
(II) IMPROVE ROADS OR OTHER INFRASTRUCTURE THAT PROVIDE
ACCESS TO A STATE PARK OR STATE WILDLIFE AREA ACCESSED FROM
WITHIN THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S BOUNDARY TO SPECIFICALLY
WITHSTAND THE CURRENT AND PROJECTED VOLUME AND WEIGHT OF
TRAFFIC ENTERING AND EXITING THE STATE PARK OR STATE WILDLIFE
AREA; AND
(III) PROVIDE EQUITABLE ACCESS FOR ALL VISITORS TO A STATE
PARK OR STATE WILDLIFE AREA ACCESSED FROM WITHIN THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT'S BOUNDARY, REGARDLESS OF THE TYPE OF VEHICLE OR
-6- SB26-030

METHOD OF TRANSPORTATION THE VISITOR MAY BE USING TO ACCESS THE
STATE PARK OR STATE WILDLIFE AREA.
(b) THE DIVISION SHALL ADMINISTER THE GRANT PROGRAM AND
SHALL AWARD GRANTS AS PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION. GRANTS SHALL BE
PAID OUT OF THE STATE PARK AND STATE WILDLIFE AREA ACCESS CASH
FUND CREATED IN SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION.
(c) THE DIVISION SHALL IMPLEMENT THE GRANT PROGRAM IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION. THE DIVISION MAY ADOPT RULES TO
IMPLEMENT THE GRANT PROGRAM AND CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS
SECTION.
(3) State park and state wildlife area access grant program -
application - criteria - awards.
(a) TO RECEIVE A GRANT, AN ELIGIBLE APPLICANT MUST SUBMIT
AN APPLICATION TO THE DIVISION. THE DIVISION MAY DETERMINE THE
FORM AND MANNER OF AN APPLICATION.
(b) THE DIVISION SHALL REVIEW THE APPLICATIONS RECEIVED
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(c) SUBJECT TO THE MONEY AVAILABLE IN THE STATE PARK AND
STATE WILDLIFE AREA ACCESS CASH FUND, THE DIVISION SHALL AWARD
GRANTS AS PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION. THE DIVISION SHALL DISTRIBUTE
THE GRANT MONEY WITHIN SIXTY DAYS AFTER THE DIVISION AWARDS A
GRANT.
(4) Reporting requirements.
(a) ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 1, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE EACH
AUGUST 1 THEREAFTER, A LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT RECEIVES A GRANT
THROUGH THE GRANT PROGRAM SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE DIVISION
REGARDING THE INFORMATION LISTED IN SUBSECTION (4)(b) OF THIS
-7- SB26-030

SECTION.
(b) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE EACH
OCTOBER 1 THEREAFTER, THE DIVISION SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES TRANSPORTATION, HOUSING, AND LOCAL
GOVERNMENT COMMITTEE AND THE SENATE LOCAL GOVERNMENT AND
HOUSING COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, AND THE JOINT
BUDGET COMMITTEE. AT A MINIMUM, THE DIVISION'S REPORT MUST
INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION REGARDING EACH GRANT
AWARDED IN THE PREVIOUS TWELVE MONTHS:
(I) THE AMOUNT OF THE GRANT AWARDED;
(II) HOW THE GRANT MONEY WAS OR IS INTENDED TO BE USED,
INCLUDING A DESCRIPTION OF THE PROJECT FUNDED BY THE GRANT AND
THE PROJECT'S COMPLETION STATUS; AND
(III) THE ESTIMATED IMPACT OF THE PROJECT ON:
(A) EQUITABLE ACCESS TO THE STATE PARK OR STATE WILDLIFE
AREA ACCESSED FROM WITHIN THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S BOUNDARY;
(B) THE CONDITION OF THE ROADS OR OTHER INFRASTRUCTURE
THAT PROVIDE ACCESS TO THE STATE PARK OR STATE WILDLIFE AREA
ACCESSED FROM WITHIN THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT'S BOUNDARY;
(C) THE VOLUME AND WEIGHT OF TRAFFIC ENTERING AND EXITING
THE STATE PARK OR STATE WILDLIFE AREA, INCLUDING ANY IMPACT ON OR
CHANGE TO THE TYPE OF VEHICLES OR WATERCRAFT ACCESSING THE
STATE PARK OR STATE WILDLIFE AREA; AND
(D) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE DIVISION DEEMS
NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE TO REPORT ABOUT THE GRANTS AWARDED.
(c) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), THE
REPORTING REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (4)(b) OF THIS
-8- SB26-030

SECTION CONTINUE INDEFINITELY.
(5) State park and state wildlife area access cash fund.
(a) THE STATE PARK AND STATE WILDLIFE AREA ACCESS CASH
FUND IS CREATED IN THE STATE TREASURY. THE FUND CONSISTS OF MONEY
CREDITED TO THE FUND PURSUANT TO SECTION 33-12-108 (4)(e)(II);
GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS; AND ANY OTHER MONEY THAT THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE OR TRANSFER TO THE FUND.
(b) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND
INCOME DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE
FUND TO THE FUND.
(c) MONEY IN THE FUND IS CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED TO THE
DIVISION FOR THE PURPOSE OF AWARDING STATE PARK AND STATE
WILDLIFE AREA ACCESS GRANTS PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 33-10-111, amend
(1) as follows:
33-10-111. Parks and outdoor recreation cash fund - parks for
future generations trust fund - creation - fees - accounting
expenditures for roads and highways - definition.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section and
sections 33-10.5-104.5, 33-10.5-105, 33-12-108 (4)(e)(II), 33-14-106,
33-14.5-106, and 33-15-103, all money derived pursuant to articles 10 to
15 of this title 33 from division facilities and fees, and all interest earned
on the money, shall be credited to the parks and outdoor recreation cash
fund, which is hereby created, together with all money donated,
transferred, or appropriated from whatever source for the use of the
division in administering, managing, and supervising the state parks and
outdoor recreation system and in the financing of impact assistance grants
-9- SB26-030

pursuant to part 3 of article 25 of title 30. All cash receipts from
state-owned desert, saline, and internal improvement lands shall be
credited to the parks and outdoor recreation cash fund.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 33-12-108, amend
(4)(e)(I)(C) and (4)(e)(II); and add (4)(e)(III) and (4)(e.5) as follows:
33-12-108. Keep Colorado wild pass - assess with vehicle
registration - option to decline to pay - rules - short title - legislative
declaration - definitions.
(4) (e) The state treasurer shall credit the pass fees that the
executive director of the department of revenue transmits pursuant to
subsection (4)(d) of this section in each state fiscal year as follows:
(I) The first thirty-six million dollars shall be allocated as follows:
(C) One million dollars to the Colorado avalanche information
center fund created in section 24-33-116 (2)(c) in furtherance of the goal
set forth in subsection (2)(a)(IV)(D) of this section; and
(II) After making the allocations under subsection (4)(e)(I) of this
section, the state treasurer shall credit one-half of any remaining money
to the wildlife cash fund and one-half of any remaining money to the
parks and outdoor recreation cash fund in furtherance of the goals set
forth in subsections (2)(a)(IV)(E) to (2)(a)(IV)(J) of this section ANY
REMAINING MONEY TO THE STATE PARK AND STATE WILDLIFE AREA
ACCESS CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 24-32-136 (5); AND
(III) AFTER MAKING THE ALLOCATIONS UNDER SUBSECTION
(4)(e)(II) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ANY
MONEY REMAINING IN THE STATE PARK AND STATE WILDLIFE AREA ACCESS
CASH FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (4)(e.5) OF THIS SECTION.
(e.5) (I) IF NO APPLICATIONS FOR GRANTS FROM THE STATE PARK
-10- SB26-030

AND STATE WILDLIFE AREA ACCESS GRANT PROGRAM CREATED IN SECTION
24-32-136 ARE RECEIVED BY DECEMBER 31, 2029, THE DIVISION OF LOCAL
GOVERNMENT IN THE DEPARTMENT OF LOCAL AFFAIRS THAT ADMINISTERS
THE GRANT PROGRAM SHALL NOTIFY THE STATE TREASURER WITHIN SIXTY
DAYS AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2029, THAT NO APPLICATIONS WERE
RECEIVED.
(II) ON DECEMBER 31, 2030, AND ON EACH DECEMBER 31
THEREAFTER, IF NO APPLICATIONS FOR GRANTS FROM THE GRANT
PROGRAM ARE RECEIVED WITHIN THAT YEAR, THE DIVISION OF LOCAL
GOVERNMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE STATE TREASURER WITHIN SIXTY DAYS
AFTER DECEMBER 31 OF THAT YEAR THAT NO APPLICATIONS WERE
RECEIVED.
(III) IF THE STATE TREASURER RECEIVES THE NOTICE PROVIDED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(e.5)(I) OR (4)(e.5)(II) OF THIS SECTION, THE
STATE TREASURER SHALL, ON MARCH 15 OF THE YEAR AFTER THE NOTICE
IS PROVIDED, TRANSFER:
(A) ONE-HALF OF THE MONEY REMAINING IN THE STATE PARK AND
STATE WILDLIFE AREA ACCESS CASH FUND TO THE WILDLIFE CASH FUND;
AND
(B) ONE-HALF OF THE MONEY REMAINING IN THE STATE PARK AND
STATE WILDLIFE AREA ACCESS CASH FUND TO THE PARKS AND OUTDOOR
RECREATION CASH FUND, IN FURTHERANCE OF THE GOALS SET FORTH IN
SUBSECTIONS (2)(a)(IV)(E) TO (2)(a)(IV)(J) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 6. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
-11- SB26-030

referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-12- SB26-030